src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronouns
!  -----


LEXICON Pronouns !how do I get pronouns to continue on to nouns? should I just put them together? how do I then add all of this extra info I have here?
ကျွန်တော်+Pro+1+Sg:ကျွန်တော် Pro "male slave";
ကျွန်တော်+Pro+1+Sg+Use/-Spell:ကျနော် Pro  "male slave";
ကျွန်တော်+Pro+1+Fem+Sg+Use/-Spell:ကျွန်မ Pro "female slave";
ကျွန်တော်+Pro+1+Fem+Sg+Use/-Spell:ကျမ Pro ;
ကျွန်တော်+Pro+1+Formal:ကျွနုပ် Pro ;
ကျွန်တော်+Pro+1+Informal:ကျုပ် Pro ;
ကျွန်တော်+Pro+1+Intimate+Sg:ငါ Pro "I";
ကျွန်တော်+Pro+1+ToMonk+Sg:တပည့်တော် Pro "male disciple";
ကျွန်တော်+Pro+1+Female+ToMonk:တပည့်တော်မ Pro "female disciple";

မင်း+Pro+2+MaleSpeaker:ခင်ဗျား Pro ;
မင်း+Pro+2+FemaleSpeaker:ရှင် Pro ;
မင်း+Pro+2+Male:မင်း Pro ;
မင်း+Pro+2+Female:နင် Pro ;
မင်း+Pro+2+Formal:သင် Pro ;
မင်း+Pro+2+Formal:လူကြီးမင်း Pro ;
မင်း+Pro+2+Formal:ကိုယ်တော် Pro ;

သူ+Pro+3:သူ Pro ;
သူ+Pro+3+Female:သူမ Pro ;
သူ+Pro+3+Derogatory:သင်း Pro ;



! focus on morphology, divide continutation classes based on what affixes it can take
!
